Washington statutes.
RCW 26.23.075

Payments—Dishonored checks—Fees—Rules.

For any payment made by a check as defined in RCW 62A.3-104, if the instrument is dishonored under RCW 62A.3-515, the costs and fees authorized under RCW 62A.3-515 apply. The department may establish procedures and adopt rules to enforce this section.

[ 2000 c 215 s 4.]